Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.20.005

Deposits by individuals governed by chapter 30A.22 RCW.

Deposits made by individuals in a national bank, state bank[,] or other banking institution subject to the supervision of the director are governed by chapter 30A.22 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 190; 1994 c 92 s 74; 1981 c 192 s 23. Formerly RCW 30.20.005.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.